test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tarw35_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tarõ: # Noun (35) tarõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    tarõ+N+Sg+Nom: tarõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Gen: tarõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Par: tarrõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ill: tarrõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ine: [tarõn, tarõh, tarõhn]
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ela: tarõst
    tarõ+N+Sg+All: tarõlõ
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ade: tarõl
    tarõ+N+Sg+Abl: tarõlt
    tarõ+N+Sg+Tra: tarõs
    tarõ+N+Sg+Ter: tarõniq
    tarõ+N+Sg+Abe: tarõldaq
    tarõ+N+Sg+Com: [tarõgaq, tarõga]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Nom: tarõq
    tarõ+N+Pl+Gen: tarri
    tarõ+N+Pl+Par: tarri
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ill: [tarrihe, tarri, tarridõ]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ine: [tarin, tarih, tarihn, tarrin, tarrih, tarrihn]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ela: [tarist, tarrist]
    tarõ+N+Pl+All: [tarilõ, tarrilõ]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ade: [taril, tarril]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Abl: [tarilt, tarrilt]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Tra: [taris, tarris]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Ter: [tariniq, tarriniq]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Abe: [tarildaq, tarrildaq, tarilda, tarrilda]
    tarõ+N+Pl+Com: [tarrigaq]
